Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.160

Federal aid.

(1) A municipality is authorized to accept, receive, and receipt for federal moneys and other moneys, either public or private, for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, or operation of airports and other air navigation facilities and sites therefor, and to comply with the provisions of the laws of the United States and any rules and regulations made thereunder for the expenditure of federal moneys upon airports and other air navigation facilities.

(2) The governing body of any municipality is authorized to designate the state secretary of transportation as its agent to accept, receive, and receipt for federal moneys on its behalf for airport purposes and to contract for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, or operation of airports or other air navigation facilities, and may enter into an agreement with the secretary of transportation prescribing the terms and conditions of such agency in accordance with federal laws, rules, and regulations and applicable laws of this state. Such moneys as are paid over by the United States government shall be paid over to the municipality under such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the United States government in making the grant.

(3) All contracts for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, or operation of airports or other air navigation facilities, made by the municipality itself or through the agency of the state secretary of transportation, shall be made pursuant to the laws of this state governing the making of like contracts, except that where the acquisition, construction, improvement, enlargement, maintenance, equipment, or operation is financed wholly or partly with federal moneys, the municipality or the secretary of transportation, as its agent, may let contracts in the manner prescribed by the federal authorities, acting under the laws of the United States, and any rules or regulations made thereunder, notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary.

[ 1984 c 7 s 6; 1945 c 182 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-38. Formerly RCW 14.08.160, 14.08.170, and 14.08.180.]